New Jersey, session 222, A860.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection c. of section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5) or any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, for a taxpayers first privilege period beginning on or after January 1 following the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) and for the next four privilege periods thereafter, a taxpayer that is not an S corporation or a partnership with an entire net income of more than $100,000 for a privilege period shall be assessed a franchise tax at a rate of 7.5 percent of the taxpayers entire net income for the privilege period. 2.    Section 1 of P.L.2018, c.162 (C.54:10A-5.41) is repealed. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to privilege periods beginning on or after January 1 of the year following enactment.